Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1557
Department; littering laws; appropriate provisions posted.

The penalties which may be imposed for littering in this state and any provisions of the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling Act deemed appropriate by the department shall be posted along public highways of this state, at visitor centers, at the entrance to state parks and recreation areas, at public beaches, and at such other public places as the department determines is necessary to accomplish the purposes of the act.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 24;

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 10.
December 1, 2020